Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-713.01
Application of act to nonresident subject to personal jurisdiction.

A tribunal of this state exercising personal jurisdiction over a nonresident in a proceeding under the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act or under other law of this state relating to a support order or recognizing a foreign support order may receive evidence from outside this state pursuant to section 42-729, communicate with a tribunal outside this state pursuant to section 42-730, and obtain discovery through a tribunal outside this state pursuant to section 42-731. In all other respects, sections 42-714 to 42-747.04 do not apply and the tribunal shall apply the procedural and substantive law of this state.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 53;

Laws 2015, LB415, § 13.